Missouri, session 2026, SB1581.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
seven new sections, to be known as sections 191.1610, 191.1613,
191.1616, 191.1619, 191.1622, 191.1625, and 191.1628, to read
as follows:
191.1610. Sections 191.1610 to 191.1628 shall be known
and may be cited as the "Veterans Mental Health Innovation
Act".
191.1613. As used in sections 191.1610 to 191.1628,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Applicant", an entity that applies for a grant
under section 191.1616;
(2) "Consortium", a group created by law in another
state of the United States for the purpose of conducting
drug development clinical trials with ibogaine;
(3) "Department", the department of health and senior
services;
(4) "Ibogaine", ibogaine and ibogaine-based
therapeutics, including, but not limited to, ibogaine
analogs.
191.1616. 1. Subject to appropriation, the department
shall award grants to conduct certified clinical drug

SB 1581 2
development trials overseen by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration on the use of ibogaine for the treatment of
opioid use disorder, co-occurring substance use disorder, or
any other neurological or mental health condition for which
ibogaine demonstrates efficacy. The department shall award
grants only to an entity that satisfies all of the following:
(1) Is located within this state;
(2) Has a history of proven research and treatment of
neurological diseases and expertise in substance dependence,
emotional trauma, and physical or neurological trauma;
(3) Has a neurosurgery program with the requisite
clinical and research facilities and that is:
(a) Staffed by professionals having expertise in the
most challenging neurological and neurosurgical conditions;
and
(b) Capable of providing the necessary infrastructure
and expertise to deliver cardiac intensive care services;
(4) Has the ability to facilitate pioneering research
and innovation in diagnosis and treatment of neurological
conditions;
(5) Has demonstrated to the department that the entity
has a commitment for matching moneys of gifts, grants, and
donations from sources other than this state in an amount
equal to the amount to be awarded to conduct the certified
clinical research study on the use of ibogaine for the
treatment of neurological diseases; and
(6) Has signed an agreement with a consortium
established by the government of another state within the
United States, whether acting directly or through an agent
or joint venture, that satisfies all of the following:

SB 1581 3
(a) Has submitted an investigational new drug (IND)
application to the U.S. Food and Drug Administration in
accordance with 21 CFR 312; and
(b) Has requested a breakthrough therapy designation
for ibogaine from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration
under 21 U.S.C. Section 356.
2. The department shall not disburse the funding
authorized in this section to an applicant until the
applicant receives, and the department verifies the receipt
of, matching funds from sources other than the state.
3. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Ibogaine Study Fund", which shall consist of moneys
appropriated to it by the general assembly and any gifts,
contributions, grants, or bequests received from federal,
private, or other sources. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170
and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation,
moneys in this fund shall be used solely to award grants
under this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
191.1619. 1. An applicant selected to conduct
ibogaine drug development clinical trials shall quarterly
prepare and submit to the department:

SB 1581 4
(1) A report on the progress of the drug development
clinical trials conducted under sections 191.1616 to
191.1622; and
(2) A financial status report, including information
to verify expenditures of state funds and required matching
funds.
2. The department shall submit a report to the general
assembly on the progress of the drug development clinical
trials conducted under sections 191.1616 to 191.1622 and the
financial status of the trials before December first of each
year.
191.1622. 1. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Ibogaine Intellectual Property Fund", which
shall consist of all revenue attributable to all
intellectual property rights and other commercial rights
that may arise from drug development clinical trials
conducted by a multistate consortium under sections 191.1616
to 191.1622 during the period for which the trials are
funded and any following period of commercialization. The
state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In
accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state
treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund
shall be used solely for programs that assist veterans or
other at-risk populations in this state.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to
the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of
the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general
revenue fund.
3. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund
in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any

SB 1581 5
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
4. For purposes of this section, intellectual property
rights and other commercial rights arising from the drug
development clinical trials conducted under sections
191.1616 to 191.1622 include any of the following as related
to the trials:
(1) Intellectual property, technology, and inventions;
(2) Patents, trademarks, and licenses;
(3) Proprietary and confidential information;
(4) Trade secrets, data, and databases;
(5) Tools, methods, and processes;
(6) Treatment models or techniques;
(7) Administration protocols; and
(8) Works of authorship.
191.1625. 1. The provisions of this section shall
apply only if ibogaine is approved by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration to treat a medical condition.
2. No person shall prescribe ibogaine for a patient
except a physician licensed under chapter 334.
3. A physician licensed under chapter 334 shall
supervise the administration of ibogaine at a hospital or
other licensed health care facility to ensure the patient's
safety while the patient is under the influence of ibogaine.
4. The provisions of this section shall not preclude a
physician from administering ibogaine in accordance with
federal law.
191.1628. 1. If, before implementing any provision of
sections 191.1610 to 191.1628, a state agency determines
that a waiver or authorization from a federal agency is
necessary for implementation of that provision, the agency
affected by the provision shall request the waiver or

SB 1581 6
authorization and may delay implementing that provision
until the waiver or authorization is granted.
2. The department shall begin accepting grant
applications under section 191.1616 before November 1, 2026.
✓